Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska15-223
Water; rates; regulation.

A city of the primary class shall have the power to fix the rate to be paid for the use of water furnished by the city or any person or corporation by means of waterworks and provide by ordinance that any tax for the use of water furnished by such city shall be a lien upon the property where such water is furnished.

Laws 1901, c. 16, § 129, XXVII, p. 134;

R.S.1913, § 4437;

C.S.1922, § 3821;

C.S.1929, § 15-224;

R.S.1943, § 15-223;

Laws 2020, LB1003, § 40.